da: Plantesort af gobo-rod: Daikon-burre; Horikawa; Shirohada; Takinogawa; Uenoyama; Watanabe; Anden
vi: Loại rễ Gobo: Củ ngưu bàng daikon; Horikawa; Shirohada; Takinogawa; Uenoyama; Watanabe; Khác
el: Ποικιλία ρίζας Gobo: Daikon burdock; Horikawa; Shirohada; Takinogawa; Uenoyama; Watanabe; Άλλο
cs: Odrůda kořene Gobo: Ředkev lopuch; Horikawa; Shirohada; Takinogawa; Uenoyama; Watanabe; Ostatní
it: Varietà di radice del gobo: Bardana daikon; Horikawa; Shirohada; Takinogawa; Uenoyama; Watanabe; Altro
pt-BR: Variedade de gobo (raiz de bardana): Bardana daikon; Horikawa; Shirohada; Takinogawa; Uenoyama; Watanabe; Outro
zh-CN: 牛蒡根品种: 萝卜牛蒡; 堀川; 白肌; 泷野川; 上野山; 渡边; 其他
nl: Gobo-wortelras: Daikon-klitwortel; Horikawa; Shirohada; Takinogawa; Uenoyama; Watanabe; Anders
ru: Сорт корня гобо: Дайкон-лопух; Хорикава; Сирохада; Такиногава; Уэнояма; Ватанабэ; Другое
hu: Gobo gyökérfajta: Daikon bojtorján; Horikawa; Shirohada; Takinogawa; Uenoyama; Watanabe; Egyéb
zh-TW: 牛蒡根品種: 蘿蔔牛蒡; 堀川; 白肌; 瀧野川; 上野山; 渡邊; 其他
pt-PT: Variedade de raiz Gobo: Bardana daikon; Horikawa; Shirohada; Takinogawa; Uenoyama; Watanabe; Outro
bg-BG: Сорт корен от репей (гобо): Репей Дайкон; Хорикава; Широхада; Такиногава; Уенояма; Ватанабе; Друго
fr: Variété de racine de gobo: Bardane daikon; Horikawa; Shirohada; Takinogawa; Uenoyama; Watanabe; Autre
lt-LT: Gobo šaknies veislė: Daikon varnalėša; Horikawa; Shirohada; Takinogawa; Uenoyama; Watanabe; Kita
sk-SK: Odroda koreňa lopúcha: Lopúch Daikon; Horikawa; Shirohada; Takinogawa; Uenoyama; Watanabe; Iné
fi: Isotakiaisen juuren lajike: Daikon-takiainen; Horikawa; Shirohada; Takinogawa; Uenoyama; Watanabe; Muu
ja: ゴボウの種類: 大根ごぼう; 堀川; 白肌; 滝野川; 上野山; 渡辺; その他
de: Klettenwurzelsorte: Daikon-Klette; Horikawa; Shirohada; Takinogawa; Uenoyama; Watanabe; Andere
nb: Gobo-rotvariant: Daikon-borre; Horikawa; Shirohada; Takinogawa; Uenoyama; Watanabe; Annet
th: พันธุ์รากโกโบ: โกโบหัวไชเท้า; โฮริคาวะ; ชิโรฮาดะ; ทาคิโนกาว่า; อุเอโนะยามะ; วาตานาเบะ; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Varietatea de rădăcină Gobo: Brusture Daikon; Horikawa; Shirohada; Takinogawa; Uenoyama; Watanabe; Altele
sl-SI: Sorta korenine gobo: Dajkon repinec; Horikawa; Shirohada; Takinogawa; Uenoyama; Watanabe; Drugo
tr: Gobo kök çeşidi: Daikon dulavratotu; Horikawa; Shirohada; Takinogawa; Uenoyama; Watanabe; Diğer
hr-HR: Sorta korijena Gobo: Daikon čičak; Horikawa; Shirohada; Takinogawa; Uenoyama; Watanabe; Ostalo
sv: Gobo rotsort: Daikonkardborre; Horikawa; Shirohada; Takinogawa; Uenoyama; Watanabe; Annan
pl: Odmiana korzenia gobo: Łopian Daikon; Horikawa; Shirohada; Takinogawa; Uenoyama; Watanabe; Inna
ko: 우엉 품종: 무 우엉; 호리카와; 시로하다; 타키노가와; 우에노야마; 와타나베; 기타
es: Variedad de raíz de gobo: Bardana daikon; Horikawa; Shirohada; Takinogawa; Uenoyama; Watanabe; Otra
en: Gobo root variety: Daikon burdock; Horikawa; Shirohada; Takinogawa; Uenoyama; Watanabe; Other